Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-529
Permit to kill deer, antelope, or elk; tagging and storage.

The commission shall provide by regulations for the tagging and storage of the carcasses of deer, antelope, or elk after the close of any such limited season in accordance with section 37-508.

Laws 1945, c. 85, § 2, p. 305;

Laws 1953, c. 124, § 3, p. 390;

Laws 1985, LB 557, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-216;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 249.